Hawaii statutes.
[§467B‑16] Service of process;
substituted service. (a) A charitable
organization, professional solicitor, or professional fundraising counsel that
is required to be registered under this chapter and that either has its
principal place of business outside of the State or is organized under the laws
of another state, and who does not have a registered agent with the department
of commerce and consumer affairs, is considered to have irrevocably appointed
the department of the attorney general as its agent for the service of a
summons, subpoena, or other process directed to the charitable organization,
professional fundraising counsel, or professional solicitor, or to a director,
officer, partner, or principal of the charitable organization, professional fundraising
counsel, or professional solicitor in an investigation, action, or other
proceeding brought under this chapter, or for purpose of service of a subpoena
under section 467B-9.3.

(b) Service under subsection (a) is complete
if the department immediately sends notice of the service and a copy of the
process to the charitable organization, professional fundraising counsel, or
professional solicitor, or to a director, officer, partner, or principal of the
charitable organization, professional fundraising counsel, professional
solicitor, or other person to whom it is directed, by registered mail, return
receipt requested, to the last address known to the department of the
charitable organization, professional fundraising counsel, professional
solicitor, or other person to whom it is directed.

(c) A charitable
organization, professional fundraising counsel, or professional solicitor that
is required to be registered under this chapter and that has its principal
place of business within this State, and does not have a registered agent with
the department of commerce and consumer affairs, may be served with a subpoena,
summons, or other court process by personal service within this State. If
personal service within this State cannot be made, substituted service may be
made by any of the following methods:

(1) Mailing by registered or certified mail to the
last-known place of business, residence, or abode within or without this State
of the person for whom the subpoena is intended;

(2) For any person other than a natural person, in
the manner provided for service of summons in an action or suit; or

(3) Service as directed by a court in lieu of
personal service within this State. [L 2011, c 40, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next